Maryland, session 2025, HB1165.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
9–109.
(A) (1) IF A PARENT FAILS TO COMPLY WITH A COURT–ORDERED
VISITATION SCHEDULE WITHOUT JUST CAUSE, THE OTHER PARENT MAY PETITION
THE COURT FOR AN EMERGENCY REEVALUATION OF THE VISITATION SCHEDULE.
(2) IF THE COURT DETERMINES THAT A PETITION IS IN ORDER, THE
COURT SHALL HOLD AN EMERGENCY HEARING WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER THE
PETITION HAS BEEN FILED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1165*

HOUSE BILL 1165
(B) THE COURT:
(1) SHALL:
(I) CALCULATE THE AMOUNT OF VISITATION TIME
IMPROPERLY DENIED TO THE PETITIONER;
(II) AWARD THE PETITIONER EXTRA TIME IN AN AMOUNT
SUFFICIENT TO COMPENSATE ANY MISSED VISITATION TIME UNDER THE VISITATION
AGREEMENT;
(III) SCHEDULE ANY EXTRA TIME AWARDED UNDER ITEM (II) OF
THIS ITEM IN A MANNER THAT IS:
1. CONSISTENT WITH THE BEST INTERESTS OF THE
CHILD;
2. CONVENIENT FOR THE PETITIONER; AND
3. AT THE EXPENSE OF THE NONCOMPLIANT PARENT;
AND
(IV) ORDER THE NONCOMPLIANT PARENT TO PAY COURT COSTS
AND REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES INCURRED BY THE PETITIONER IN THE EFFORT
TO ENFORCE THE VISITATION SCHEDULE;
(2) MAY ORDER THE NONCOMPLIANT PARENT TO:
(I) ATTEND A COURT–APPROVED PARENTING COURSE;
(II) PERFORM COMMUNITY SERVICE, IF THE COMMUNITY
SERVICE WILL NOT INTERFERE WITH THE BEST INTERESTS OF THE CHILD; AND
(III) ASSUME THE FINANCIAL RESPONSIBILITY OF ENSURING
THAT THE COURT–ORDERED VISITATION SCHEDULE IS MAINTAINED WHEN THE
NONCOMPLIANT PARENT AND CHILD LIVE MORE THAN 20 MILES FROM THE
PETITIONER;
(3) MAY, ON THE REQUEST OF THE PETITIONER, MODIFY THE
VISITATION SCHEDULE IF THE COURT FINDS THAT A MODIFICATION WOULD BE IN
THE BEST INTERESTS OF THE CHILD; AND
(4) MAY IMPOSE ANY OTHER REASONABLE SANCTION.

HOUSE BILL 1165 3
(C) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES AN ORDER OF THE COURT UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION MAY BE HELD IN CONTEMPT OF COURT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.